src/phonology/fkv-phon.twolc
"Gradation k:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
k:j <=> [a|ä|æ|e|i|i6:] _ [e:|i:]     (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; ! mäki  - mäjen
                      i _ [ö:|o:]     (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; !
                    i6: _ [e:|i|ä|a:] (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; ! poika poha, pojitte
                  [e|i] _ [e:|i|ä:|a:|u]  %^Por:             %^WG:0 (%> i2:i) ; ! aika-aijan (Dummy: before ^WG? !TODO DONE move to k:0 in Var
             \[e] [r|l] _  e:         (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; ! jälki:jäljen, sylki:syljen
            [a|e] [r|l] _  e          (Dummy:)               %^WG:0 %> ; ! haljeta, halkee, seljetä, selkee
 [.#.|#:]   Cns [o|u] l _  i   %^Por: %^WG:0                           ; ! polki-poljin
 [.#.|#:]     Cns [o|u] _  e:         %^WG:0                           ; ! lukkeet  - lujen
 [.#.|#:]         j a   _  a:     %^WG:0 ([%^AO:|%^AE:]) (%>) (i3:) (%>)  ; ! jakkaat:jajan
 [.#.|#:]     Cns Vow i _  u      %^WG:0 ([%^AO:|%^AE:]) (%>) (i3:) (%>)  ; ! kaikkuut:kaijun
                      h _  e:         (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0       ; ! vehke- - vehjet, lohke- lohjeta, puhke- puhjeta

"Gradation k:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
k:0 <=>               h _ [Vow: - e:]   (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0      ; !tuhka - tuhat, uhata - uhkaa
 [.#.|#:] [m|h] (u)   a _ a:            (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 (%^AO:0 %> i2: %> \n)  ; !makaa:maata, haka:haan
            [i u|a u|y] _ e             (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0      ; !kykenee - kyetä, laukkee - laueta,liuota-liukkee
         [a|e|i|o|y|ä|ö] _ e       n                           %^WG:0      ; !ikene- - ien
               ö: [l|r] _ [ö|ä]         (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0      ; ! mörkö:mörö, pölkää:pölätä (check) but NOT: sylki - syljin
    [e|i|o|u|y|ä] [l|r] _ [a:|ä:|y|u|o] (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0      ; ! selkä:selän, nälkä:nälän, härkä:härän, yrkä:yrän
               a: [l|r] _ [NotEYUB:|u]  (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0      ; ! varas - varkaan, NOT: sylki:syljin
               e  [l|r] _ i (%>)                               %^WG:0 (%>) ; !keritä - kerkkii
                  [o|ö] _ e:  [%^Var:0|%^Jok:0] (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ; !joki (stem joke) joen
                  a  i  _ a   %^Var:0                          %^WG:0 %>   ; !aika aian
                  a  i  _ a:o %^Var:0       (%^WG:0) (%^AO:0) %> i2: %> \n ; ! aika aian
                    r u _     %^Var:0            i             %^WG:0 %> s ; !ruvis -> ruis in var
     Vow: ([l|m|n|r]) k _ (:h) (Dummy:) Vow: (Vow:0) (Dummy:) (:i) (l|r|n) (e:0) (Dial:0) %^WG: ; !kk:k
     Vow: ([l|m|n|r]) k _  :o %^WG: %^AO: %> i2:i   %> [ n|t ]  [e|:a|:ä] ; ! kk:k
                u [l|r] _ u  (Dial:)  %^WG:0  ;
                   i t: _ (0:) ä:  [%^WG: %^AE:|%> i5:i :i]  ; ! pitkä, pitempi, pissiin

!!€ halke^WG%>t^A
!!€ halje0>ta

!j når H-vokal er [i|e|ä]
!rk: r,rj -- varkhtaat:faras, parkua:parun, -- !märkä:märjät, särkeä:särjen, särkiä:särjin
!lk: l,lj -- jalka:jalat, jälkuä:nälyn, -- kulkea:kuljen, kulkia:kuljen,
!hk: j,hj -- tuhka:tuhat - pohkheet:pohjet

!!€ mäke^WG>n
!!€ mäje0>n
!!€ aika^Por^WG>n
!!€ aija00>n
!!€ jälke^WG>n
!!€ jälje0>n
!!€ luke^WG>n
!!€ luje0>n
! jälki: jäljen ; järki; järjen; kulkkeet: kuljen; särkkeet : särjen

! Pöljätä tai pölätä. Terje, sanakirja ja korpus sanovat pölätä.
! Eiran grammatiikki sannoo pöljätä, mutta sitä ei löyty korpuksesta. YAML-sanoo pölätä, joten pidettiin pölätä

!!€ pölkä^WG>t^A
!!€ pöl0ä0>tä
!!€ tuhka^WG>t
!!€ tuh0a0>t
!!€ maka^WG>t^A
!!€ ma0a0>ta
!!€ kyke^WG>t^A
!!€ ky0e0>tä
!!€ sarka^WG>n
!!€ sar0a0>n
! check parvun vs. parun.
!!€ parku^WG>n
!!€ par0u0>n


"Gradation k3:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
k3:0 <=> u o _ a %^WG: ;

!ruovan u0a, uva. Løysing: uk3a:u0a, uka:uva. u_a-konteksten ut av k:0-regelen

!!€ huok3a^WG>t^A
!!€ huo0a0>ta

"Gradation k:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
k:v <=> [Vow - [e|i]] _ [o|ö|u|y]           (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ;
     \i [o|ö|u|y] _ (%^Por:) [Vow - e:] (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ; !ruoka (^Por) is for ruvis
              u o _ (%^Por:) [Vow: - e:] (Dummy:) %^WG:0 (%^A0: %> i2:) ; !ruoka:ruovile (monikko)
[.#.|#]  Cns+  y  _  i:                       %^WG:0  %^AO:  %>  i3:  ; !nykkiit:nyvin (preteriti)
            [o|ö] _  e: %^Por:          (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ; !Por: joke:joven. Var: joke:joen
             i u  _  a                  (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ; !kiukhaan:kiuvas

!!€ ruoka^WG>n
!!€ ruova0>n

!!€ puku^WG>n
!!€ puvu0>n

!!€ koko^WG>t^A
!!€ kovo0>ta



"Gradation nk:ng"
!! __@RULENAME@__
k:g <=> Vow: n _  Vow: (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ;



!!€ sivakka^AO>i2>ne
!!€ sivak0o0>i>ne
!  !!€ paivukko^AO>i2>ne
!  !!€ paivuk0o0>i>ne
!  kulkiija^AO>i2>t^A distinguish this from por somehow.



!! !Gradation t



"Gradation Nt:NN in first syllable after short vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__
t:Nx <=> [.#.|#] Cns* Vow Nx _ :Vow     ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0]) ([i|i2:]) ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0]) %^WG:0 ?* \%^E2I:0 ;
         [.#.|#] Cns* Vow Nx _ Vow: (Dial:) %^WG: (%^A0:) %> i2: ; ! hännissä / kunnissa (vain monikon sääntö)
         [.#.|#] Cns* Vow Nx _ :Vow Cns ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0])           ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0]) %^WG:0 ?* \%^E2I:0 ;
    where Nx in ( l n r ) ;
! TODO TODO TODO for both these rules, maybe the dummy should be after the ^WG. Usually our rule is: ^WG^AO...



"Gradation t:0 for tt:t, Nt:N and vuote:vuoeksi"
!! __@RULENAME@__
t:0 <=> Vow: ([l|m|n|r]) [t|t:0] _ (:h) (Dummy:) Vow: (Vow:0) (Dummy:) (:i) (l|r|n) (e:0) (Dial:0) %^WG: ; !tytärtä
        Vow: ([l|m|n|r]) t       _  :o %^WG: %^AO: %> i2:i   %> [ n|t ]  [e|:a|:ä] ;
                         t y     _ t:0 ä r e:0 %^Var:0 %^WG:0 %^T0:0 (%^E0:0) ; !toinen t:0 happens in tt:t tytär sg nom,par. tyär tyärtä
           Vow Cns* Vow [l|n|r]  _ :Vow     ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0]) ([i|i2:]) ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0]) %^WG:0 ?* \%^E2I:0 ;
           Vow Cns* Vow [l|n|r]  _ Vow:     %^WG:0 (%^A0:) %> i2:   ; ! isäntä - isänissä *)
           Vow Cns* Vow [l|n|r]  _ :Vow Cns ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0]) ([Dummy: - %^E2I:0]) %^WG:0 ?* \%^E2I:0 ;
                             Vow _ Vow: (Cns)                          (:i)      [%^Jok:|%^Var:]  %^WG:0 \%^TJ: ;

! TODO add e ^Var E0 and T0 to these tests
! !!€ tyttär^WG
! !!€ ty00är0
! !!€ tyttär^WG>t^A
! !!€ ty00är0>tä

!!€ katto^WG>n
!!€ kat0o0>n
!!€ katt2o^WG>n
!!€ katto0>n

"ti:si"
!! __@RULENAME@__
t:s <=> Vow n  _        e:0                  %> i2: [.#.|%> Cns] ; ! Miksi vain n? Eikä nlr? tt ja dummy 
 Vow ([n|l|r]) _ (:s)   e: (Dial:0) %^E2I: ;! uusine, vesi: vete^E2I:vesi, vete^WG>n:vede0>n, vete^WG>i2>ll^A:vesillä
 Vow           _ (:s)   e:0 (Dial:0) %> i2:    %> [Cns|%^V:|%^A:] ; ! [vuosiksi, etc. | vuossii(n) | uusia] ! uusine
 Vow ([n|l|r]) _        e:0 (Dial:0) (%^AO:0) %^HMETA:0 %> h :i ; ! jok uushiin
 [i|u|y|ö] [e|u|y] _ (:s) Vow:0      (%^AO:0)      %> i3:  ; ! huuttaat:huusi, löyttäät:löysi (ei sousi, nousi tai hoisi)
 Vow  n        _      Vow:0 [Dummy:* - %^WG:0]     %> i3:  ;
 Vow [n|l|r]   _  :s    e:0 (Dial:0) %> i2:i       %> %^V: ; ! hirssii
!Vow [n|l|r]   _      Vow:0 (Dial:0) (%^WG:0) (%^E2I:)  %> i2: ; ! hirsiksi, hirsi (pl - gen par)
 Vow [n|l|r]   _        e:0 (Dial:0) (%^WG:0)   %^E2I:  %> i2: ; ! hirsiksi, hirsi (pl - gen par) *)
 Vow [n|l|r]   _ (:s) Vow:0 (%^WG:0) (%^AO:0)           %> i3: ;
             i _ k: 0: ä: %> i5:i  ; ! superlatiivi pitkä/pissiin


!!€ vete^E2I
!!€ vesi0

! vuot0e^E2I>i2>^V>n
! vuoss00>i>i>n

!!€ hirte^HMETA>hii
!!€ hirs00>hii



! TODO TODO TODO The following rule works for the vuojeksi var alternative variant, though we want both
! the t:j AND the t:0! And the t:j really just in vuosi:vuote vuojen
"t:j in Var variant vuojeksi"
!! __@RULENAME@__
t:j <=> Vow _ Vow: (Cns) (:i) %^Var: %^WG:0 %^TJ: ;

"o:u in vuosi vuote vuoet -> vuuet optional variant"
!! __@RULENAME@__
o:u <=> v u _ t:0 e %^Var: %^WG: %^UU: %> t ; !savvuhuonet
        v u _ t:0 e %^Var: %^WG: %^UU: %>   ;
      ! v u o t e  ^Var   ^WG  > t
! TODO TODO TODO with the 3 rules above all the vuosi VAR variants work! Now just need to find a away
! to make all 4 happen simultaneously (and maybe just for the word vuosi?).

!! {{{
!!€ pe#rintö^WG>n
!!€ pe#rinnö0>n
!! }}}

!!€ lentä^WG>n
!!€ lennä0>n

!!€ kiertä^WG>n
!!€ kier0ä0>n

!!€ ymmärtä^WG>n
!!€ ymmär0ä0>n

!!€ alta^WG>s
!!€ alla0>s



"Gradation t:đ"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 t:đ <=> h _ Vow: (Cns) (Dummy:)                         (:i) (Dummy:)                           %^WG:0 ;
       Vow _ Vow:     [Dummy: - [%^E2I:|%^Jok:|%^Var:]]* (:i) [Dummy: - [%^E2I:|%^Jok:|%^Var:]]* %^WG:0 ; ! TODO ^WG other tag order?
       Vow _ Vow: Cns [Dummy: - [%^E2I:|%^Jok:|%^Var:]]*      [Dummy: - [%^E2I:|%^Jok:|%^Var:]]* %^WG:0 ; ! TODO ^WG other tag order?
!                           0+ Dummy: paitsi E2I tai -Por          0+ Dummy: paitsi E2I tai -Por! TODO lisää 1.kontekstiin?
! should not include ^Jok (uuen).
! When ^Jok it should go to the t:0 rule above instead

! t:đ <=> Vow  _  Vow (Cns) (Dummy: - %^E2I:) %^WG:0 [\i3:|\i6:|\i2:] ; ! TODO ^WG other tag order keep in mind

!!€ pitä^WG^AO>i3>n
!!€ piđ000>i>n

!!€ lahta^WG>i3>n
!!€ lahđ00>i>n
!!€ lahte^WG>n
!!€ lahđe0>n
!!€ huutel^WG>^A
!!€ huuđel0>a

! "Gradation t:0 in yđin (ydin w/đ) in Var stem: yti -> yi)"
! In Por it is yti for all except the Sg+Nom and Sg+Par which has yđin yđintä, those two have ^WG!
! so should be t:0 in Var Sg+Nom and Sg+Par, now it is with đ. So t:0 instead of t:đ for those. Those two have ^WG!

! So in one rule one dialect trigger, in the other another, or at least a negation


! !! __@RULENAME@__
!  t:đ <=> Vow _ Vow: (Cns) [Dummy: - [%^E2I: | [%^Jok:|%^Var:]]]* (:i) [Dummy: - [%^E2I: | [%^Jok:|%^Var:]]]* %^WG:0 ;
!              h _ Vow: (Cns) (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ;


!%>i3
!%>i3%^WG
!%>r%>i3
!%>r%>i3%^WG
!%^AO%>i3
!%^WG%^AO%>i3
!%^WG%>i3
!v%>i3
!v%>i3%^WG

! ... not ready
!# vuot0e^E2I>i3
!0 vuoss00i>i






!! !!Assimilation

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem l"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %^N:l <=> l: %> _ ;
!!€ tul>^N^U
!!€ tul>lu

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem r"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%^N:r <=> r: %> _ ;

"Alveolar assimilation for consonant stem s"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%^N:s <=> s: %> _ \%^A: ; ! kussut, kusta, pessyt, pestä

"j:0 in front of i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
j:0 <=> l _ e: (Dial:0) %^E2I:0 ;

















! ===============
!! !!!Vow rules
! ===============

!! !!Vow harmony

!! Thefa idea of having f.ex V:e, always to a specific vowel, is to not have conflicts in
!! twolc compilation. This improves compilation time (we assume) and it make Twolc
!! behave more predictable. Weird things happen sometimes with conflicts!
!! The downside is that often you have linguistic rules for vowels that are similar
!! for a group of vowels! This is most of case. And now you have to edit it for all
!! vowel separately one by one. Hopefully, we can make sure we don't forget to do it
!! too often, by having more user feedback, especially from the paradigms in the dictionary.


!! ! For each Vowel separately

"^V:e"
!! __@RULENAME@__
! Old names:
! 1. "Vow copying in long h-illative sg first vowel"
! 2. "Vow copying in long h-illative sg second vowel"
! 3. "Vow copying in short h-illative and short partitive sg"
! 4. "Vow copying in long h sg forms both part one and part two"
%^V:e <=> Cns (Vow) e (Cns) Cns (%^Por:0) (%^HMETA:0)   %> h  _  %^V: n ; ! 1.
          Cns (Vow) e (Cns) Cns (Dial:) (%^HMETA:0) %> h %^V: _       n ; ! 2.
               Vow  e:          (Dial:)             %> h      _ [n:|m:] ; ! 3. !teehen
         :Cns       e           (Dial:)             %>        _         ; ! 3. !saamee (ainoa!) [.#.|#:|%>];
                    e:          (Dial:) %^HMETA:    %> h      _  %^V:   ; ! 4. !tyvheen
                    e:          (Dial:) %^HMETA:    %> h %^V: _         ; ! 4. !tyvheen
